South Carolina, session 2025-2026, S322.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of South Carolina: SECTION 1.  This act may be cited as the "Free to Speak Act". SECTION 2.  Article 5, Chapter 1, Title 59 of the S.C. Code is amended by adding: Section 59-1-505.  (A) For the purposes of this section: (1) "Sex" means a person's immutable biological sex, either male or female. (2) "Female" means an individual who naturally has, had, will have, or, but for a congenital anomaly or intentional or unintentional disruption, a reproductive system that at some point in time produces, transports, and utilizes eggs for fertilization. (3) "Male" means an individual who naturally has, had, will have, or, but for a congenital anomaly or intentional or unintentional disruption, a reproductive system that at some point produces, transports, and utilizes sperm for fertilization. (B) Public school employees shall not: (1) knowingly and intentionally address an unemancipated minor who is a student at the school where the employee is employed by a pronoun or title that is inconsistent with the student's sex without the written permission of a student's parent or guardian; (2) be subject to adverse employment action for declining to: (a) identify his pronouns; or (b) address a student, other public-school employee, or volunteer by a pronoun or title that is inconsistent with person's sex. (C) Public school students shall not be subject to disciplinary action for declining to: (1) identify his pronouns; or (2) address a student, public-school employee, or volunteer by a pronoun or a title that is inconsistent with the person's sex. (D) A person who is harmed by a violation of this section may bring a civil cause of action against the school district seeking injunctive relief, monetary damages, reasonable attorney's fees and costs, and other appropriate relief. A cause of action brought pursuant to this subsection must be brought no later than twenty-four months after the alleged violation occurred. SECTION 3.  Article 2, Chapter 101, Title 59 of the S.C. Code is amended by adding: Section 59-101-680.  (A) For the purposes of this section: (1) "Sex" means a person's immutable biological sex, either male or female. (2) "Female" means an individual who naturally has, had, will have, or, but for a congenital anomaly or intentional or unintentional disruption, a reproductive system that at some point in time produces, transports, and utilizes eggs for fertilization. (3) "Male" means an individual who naturally has, had, will have, or, but for a congenital anomaly or intentional or unintentional disruption, a reproductive system that at some point produces, transports, and utilizes sperm for fertilization. (B) Employees of a public institution of higher learning, including, but not limited to faculty, adjunct faculty, staff, and administrative staff, shall not be subject to adverse employment action for declining to: (1) identify his pronouns; or (2) address a student, other employee of the public institution of higher learning, or volunteer by a pronoun or title that is inconsistent with the person's sex. (C) Students of a public institution of higher learning shall not be subject to disciplinary action for declining to: (1) identify his pronouns; or (2) address a student, employee of the public institution of high learning, or volunteer by a pronoun or title that is inconsistent with the person's sex. (D) A person who is harmed by a violation of this section may bring a civil cause of action against the public institution of higher learning seeking injunctive relief, monetary damages, reasonable attorney's fees and costs, and other appropriate relief. A cause of action brought pursuant to this subsection must be brought no later than twenty-four months after the alleged violation occurred. SECTION 4.  This act takes effect upon approval by the Governor. ----XX----